Hawaii statutes.
§502-26 Copies of instruments,
certificates. The registrar, when applied to, shall furnish an attested
copy of any instrument or document recorded in the registrar's office, or of
any fact appearing upon the registrar's records. The registrar may also issue
nonattested documents or portions of any instrument or document recorded in the
registrar's office in photographic, electronic, or electrostatic form. The
registrar may issue certificates of search or encumbrance when personnel is
available for the making of the certificate.

(b) Within ten days after the end of each
week, the registrar shall deliver or forward by mail or electronic
transmission, without charge, an image and index of all instruments or
documents that have been recorded in the registrar's office during each week
relating to land in all the counties, to the county designated to act as a
central clearinghouse in a memorandum of understanding agreed upon by the
counties. The central clearinghouse shall deliver the images and index to the
other counties without charge. The index shall include the following for each
instrument:

(1) Document number;

(2) Certificate number;

(3) Date of the filing;

(4) Type of document;

(5) Names of grantor and grantee;

(6) Current tax map key number; and

(7) Location by island. [CC 1859, §1264; RL 1925,
§3142; RL 1935, §5129; RL 1945, §12729; am L 1951, c 141, §1; RL 1955, §343-20;
am L 1966, c 26, §4; HRS §502-26; gen ch 1985; am L 1993, c 141, §4; am L 2009,
c 57, §2 and c 102, §2(15)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next